Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0996.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "regulating access to social media companies by minors act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Social media company" means a person that is an interactive computer service and that provides a social media platform. (b) "Social media platform" means a website or internet application that a social media company makes available for an individual to create an account to communicate with other account holders and users through posts. Social media platform does not include any of the following: (i) Broadband internet access service as that term is defined in 47 CFR 8.1. (ii) Email. (iii) An online service, application, or website if both of the following apply: (A) Content is preselected by the provider and is not generated by account holders. (B) Interactive functionality is incidental to, directly related to, or dependent on, the preselected content described in sub-subparagraph (A). Sec. 3. (1) Beginning on the effective date of this act, a social media company shall not allow an individual who is under 16 years of age to view or access a social media platform or to create or maintain an account on a social media platform. (2) Beginning on the effective date of this act, a social media company shall not allow an individual who is 16 years of age or older but less than 18 years of age to view or access a social media platform or to create or maintain an account on a social media platform without the express written consent of the individual's parent or legal guardian. Sec. 5. If a social media company violates this act, the attorney general may bring a civil action against that social media company seeking a civil fine of $25,000.00 per day that the social media company violates this act.